Illinois, session 104th, HB4613.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 16-7 and by adding Section 28-14 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/16-7)  (from Ch. 46, par. 16-7)7    Sec. 16-7. Whenever a public question is to be submitted 8to be voted upon and has been initiated and certified in 9accordance with Article 28 of this Code, the election 10authorities to whom the question is certified shall print the 11question on the ballot for the proper election in accordance 12with Section 28-14, and shall cause it to be submitted in the 13proper precincts to those electors entitled by reason of their 14residency to vote on such question.15    The substance of such public measure shall be clearly 16indicated on a separate ballot, and two spaces shall be left 17upon the right-hand margin thereof, one for the votes favoring 18the public measure, to be designated by the word, "Yes", and 19one for the votes opposing the measure, to be designated by the 20word, "No", as in the form herein given:21--------------------- 22    Shall (here print               YES 23the substance of the           ------------------------------ HB4613- 2 -LRB104 17988 SPS 31425 b1public measure).                    NO 2-------------------------------------------------------------3    The elector shall designate his vote by a cross mark, 4thus: (X). Any such separate ballot shall be printed on paper 5of sufficient size so that when folded once it shall be large 6enough to contain the following words, which shall be printed 7on the back, "Ballot for (name of public measure to be voted 8on)." Such ballot shall be handed to the elector at the same 9time as the ballot containing the names of the candidates, and 10returned therewith by the elector to the proper office in the 11manner designated by this Act. All provisions of this Act 12relating to ballots shall apply to such separate ballot, 13except as herein otherwise provided. Such separate ballot or 14ballots shall be printed upon paper of a distinctly different 15color from any other ballot for candidates used at such 16election and from those for the question of retention in 17office of judges and of constitutional amendments and as near 18as may be practicable, be of uniform size. Any variation in the 19size of such ballots shall not impair their validity.20    In the case of a public question described in subsection 21(b) of Section 28-6, the election authority shall include on 22the ballot the description of the territory concerning which 23the question is to be submitted, as set forth in the 24certification of the public question or, where the question is 25initiated by petition filed with the authority, as set forth 26in such petition. If the election authority determines the   HB4613- 3 -LRB104 17988 SPS 31425 b1description cannot be included within the space limitations of 2the ballot, the election authority shall prepare large printed 3copies of a notice of the public question, which shall include 4the description. The notice shall be prominently displayed in 5the polling place of each precinct in which the question is to 6be submitted.7    In precincts in which voting machines are used, separate 8ballots shall not be required if such voting machines permit 9the casting of votes on such proposition.10    An electronic voting system authorized by Article 24A may 11be used in voting and tabulating the ballots on a public 12measure. When an electronic voting system is used, which 13utilizes a ballot label booklet and ballot card, there shall 14be used in the ballot label booklet a separate ballot label 15page or pages as required for such public measures or 16propositions. The page or pages for such public measures or 17propositions shall be of a color separate and distinct from 18the ballot label page or pages used for candidates and from 19those used for the propositions of retention in office of 20judges and of constitutional amendments. The ballot card 21provided for recording the voter's vote or choice on public 22measures or propositions may be the same card as is used for 23recording his vote for candidates. More than one public 24measure or proposition may be placed on the same ballot label 25page or series of pages and may be voted or recorded on the 26same column or series of columns on the same ballot card, and   HB4613- 4 -LRB104 17988 SPS 31425 b1all columns on the ballot card may be of the same color.2    However, at the nonpartisan, consolidated primary, and 3consolidated elections, the proposition for a public question 4relating to a political subdivision shall be placed on the 5ballot together with the ballot for the nomination or election 6of officers of such political subdivision to be voted upon at 7the same election, unless such placement is not feasible.8(Source: P.A. 84-1467.) 9    (10 ILCS 5/28-14 new)10    Sec. 28-14. Plain language and readability standards.11    (a) As used in this Section:12    "Ballot measure" means any public question, constitutional 13amendment, referendum, or other proposition submitted to 14voters under this Article.15    "Plain language" means wording that is clear, concise, 16logically organized, and written so that the intended audience 17can understand it without specialized legal knowledge. "Plain 18language" does not include wording that:19        (1) contains more than one passive sentence;20        (2) uses unnecessary semicolons rather than separate 21    sentences; or22        (3) contains double negatives.23    "Readability standard" means an objective measure of text 24complexity, as determined by the Flesch-Kincaid readability 25test.  HB4613- 5 -LRB104 17988 SPS 31425 b1    (b) Every ballot measure to be placed on a ballot shall be 2written in plain language and shall include a ballot measure 3summary that describes the primary purpose of the ballot 4measure and the material legal effect if the ballot measure is 5approved or rejected.6    (c) A ballot measure summary required under subsection (b) 7shall:8        (1) be neutral, non-argumentative, and avoid the 9    unnecessary use of legal terms;10        (2) state the effect of a "Yes" vote and of a "No" 11    vote;12        (3) be written to have a Flesch-Kincaid Grade Level 13    score no higher than the eighth grade; and14        (4) be no longer than 75 words for statewide ballot 15    measures or 50 words for local ballot measures.16    (d) The State Board of Elections, in consultation with the 17Attorney General, shall prepare and review statewide ballot 18measures and ballot measure summaries for compliance with this 19Section before certification. A local election authority shall 20prepare and review local ballot measures and ballot measure 21summaries for compliance with this Section before 22certification.23    (e) A registered voter may challenge a ballot measure or 24ballot measure summary for non-compliance with this Section. 25If a court finds that a ballot measure or a ballot measure 26summary does not comply, it may order that the State Board of   HB4613- 6 -LRB104 17988 SPS 31425 b1Elections or local election authority make revisions necessary 2to satisfy the requirements of this Section.